da: Rosenkvalitet: Blomsterhandlerkvalitet; Luksus; Premium; Standard; Andet
ko: 장미 등급: 플로리스트 등급; 럭셔리; 프리미엄; 표준; 기타
nl: Roos klasse: Bloemistenkwaliteit; Luxe; Premium; Standaard; Overige
zh-TW: 玫瑰等級: 花店級; 奢華; 頂級; 標準; 其他
it: Grado delle rose: Grado fiorista; Lusso; Premium; Standard; Altro
fr: Grade des roses: Qualité fleuriste; Luxe; Premium; Standard; Autre
fi: Ruusun laatu: Kukkakauppalaatu; Luksus; Premium; Vakio; Muu
lt-LT: Rožių kokybės klasė: Floristinės klasės; Prabangi; „Premium“ klasės; Standartinė; Kita
pl: Klasa róży: Florystyczna (klasa); Luksusowa; Premium; Standardowa; Inna
de: Qualitätsklasse der Rose: Floristen-Qualität; Luxus; Premium; Standard; Sonstige
hu: Rózsa minőségi osztálya: Virágbolti minőség; Luxus; Prémium; Normál; Egyéb
hr-HR: sorta ruže: Cvjećarska kvaliteta; Luksuzno; Premium; Standardno; Ostalo
nb: Rosegrad: Florist-kvalitet; Luksus; Premium; Standard; Annet
en: Rose grade: Florist grade; Luxury; Premium; Standard; Other
vi: Loại hoa hồng: Loại chuyên cho cửa hàng hoa; Cao cấp; Thượng hạng; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
tr: Gül sınıfı: Çiçekçi kalitesi; Lüks; Premium; Standart; Diğer
pt-PT: Categoria da rosa: Qualidade de florista; Luxo; Premium; Padrão; Outro
el: Κατηγορία τριαντάφυλλου: Ποιότητα ανθοπωλείου; Πολυτελείας; Premium; Τυπική; Άλλο
sl-SI: Kakovostni razred vrtnic: Cvetličarska kakovost; Luksuzna kakovost; Premium; Standardna kakovost; Drugo
ja: ローズグレード: フローリストグレード; ラグジュアリー; プレミアム; スタンダード; その他
pt-BR: Rosa classificação: Qualidade de florista; Luxo; Premium; Padrão; Outro
th: เกรดกุหลาบ: เกรดร้านดอกไม้; หรูหรา; พรีเมียม; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
es: Grado de rosas: Calidad floristería; Lujo; Premium; Estándar; Otro
bg-BG: Клас на розата: Флористко качество; Луксозно; Премиум; Стандартно; Друго
sv: Roskvalitet: Floristkvalitet; Lyx; Premium; Standard; Övrigt
sk-SK: Ružová trieda: Floristická kvalita; Luxusná; Prémiová; Štandardná; Iné
ro-RO: Grad de calitate a trandafirului: Calitate pentru florării; De lux; Premium; Standard; Altele
zh-CN: 玫瑰等级: 花店级; 奢华; 优质; 标准; 其他
ru: Сортность роз: Для флористики; Люкс; Премиум; Стандарт; Другое
cs: Růžová odrůda: Květinářská kvalita; Luxusní; Prémiová; Standardní; Jiné